en: Binding Supplies
xx: Binding Supplies
cs: Vázací potřeby
da: Indbinding – tilbehør
de: Bindesysteme
es: Materiales de encuadernación
fr: Matériel de reliure
it: Forniture per rilegature
ja: バインダー・製本用品
nl: Benodigdheden voor inbinden
no: Permutstyr
pl: Oprawa dokumentów
pt: Suprimentos para encadernação
ru: Материалы для брошюровки
sv: Pärmmaterial
tr: Ciltleme Malzemeleri

en: Binder Accessories
xx: Binder Accessories
cs: Vazačky – příslušenství
da: Ringbind – tilbehør
de: Aktenordnerzubehör
es: Accesorios de encuadernación
fr: Accessoires pour classeurs
it: Accessori rilegatura
ja: バインダー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor ringbanden
no: Tilbehør til permer
pl: Akcesoria do segregatorów
pt: Acessórios para fichários
ru: Принадлежности для брошюровки
sv: Pärmtillbehör
tr: Ciltleme Aksesuarları

en: Binder Rings
xx: Binder Rings
cs: Vázací kroužky
da: Ringbind – ringe
de: Einbandringe
es: Anillas de encuadernación
fr: Anneaux pour classeurs
it: Anelli per rilegatura
ja: バインダーリング
nl: Ringbandringen
no: Permringer
pl: Mechanizmy
pt: Anéis para encadernação
ru: Кольца для брошюровки
sv: Pärmringar
tr: Cilt Halkaları

en: Index Dividers
xx: Index Dividers
cs: Kartotékové listy
da: Kartoteksinddelere
de: Registerblätter
es: Separadores
fr: Intercalaires
it: Divisori indici
ja: インデックス
nl: Tabbladen
no: Skilleark
pl: Przekładki
pt: Divisores indexadores
ru: Разделители с указателями
sv: Pärmregister
tr: İndeks Ayraçları

en: Sheet Protectors
xx: Sheet Protectors
cs: Ochranné fólie
da: Plastlommer
de: Klarsichthüllen
es: Fundas protectoras
fr: Pochettes plastiques
it: Protezioni fogli
ja: クリアポケット
nl: Insteekhoezen
no: Arklommer
pl: Koszulki
pt: Protetores de folhas
ru: Защитные обложки для листов
sv: Arkskydd
tr: Sayfa Koruyucular

en: Binders
xx: Binders
cs: Vazačky
da: Ringbind
de: Aktenordner
es: Archivadores
fr: Classeurs, Meuble classeur
it: Raccoglitori
ja: バインダー
nl: Ringbanden
no: Permer
pl: Segregatory
pt: Fichários
ru: Сшиватели
sv: Pärmar
tr: Ciltler

en: Binding Combs & Spines
xx: Binding Combs & Spines
cs: Vázací hřebeny a hřbety
da: Indbinding – kam eller spiralryg
de: Binderücken
es: Lomos y canutillos de encuadernación
fr: Spirales et peignes pour reliures
it: Legature e dorsi per rilegatura
ja: 製本リング
nl: Bindringen
no: Innbindingsringer og -rygger
pl: Grzbiety do bindowania
pt: Espirais para encadernação
ru: Скобы и пружины для брошюровки
sv: Spiraler och ryggar för inbindning
tr: Spiral Ciltler

en: Binding Machines
xx: Binding Machines
cs: Vazbovače
da: Indbindingsmaskiner
de: Bindegeräte
es: Encuadernadoras
fr: Machines à relier
it: Rilegatrici
ja: 製本機
nl: Bindmachines
no: Innbindingsmaskiner
pl: Bindownice
pt: Máquinas de encadernação
ru: Брошюровщики
sv: Inbindningsmaskiner
tr: Ciltleme Makineleri

en: Business Card Books
xx: Business Card Books
cs: Alba na vizitky
da: Visitkort – bøger
de: Visitenkartenbücher
es: Libros para tarjetas de presentación
fr: Porte-cartes de visite
it: Raccoglitori di biglietti da visita
ja: 名刺ホルダー
nl: Visitekaartjesboeken
no: Visittkortbøker
pl: Wizytowniki
pt: Organizadores de cartões de visita
ru: Альбомы для визиток
sv: Visitkortsböcker
tr: Kartvizit Defterleri

en: Business Card Stands
xx: Business Card Stands
cs: Stojany na vizitky
da: Visitkort – holdere
de: Visitenkarten-Ständer
es: Soportes para tarjetas de visita
fr: Supports pour cartes de visite
it: Espositori per biglietti da visita
ja: 名刺スタンド
nl: Standaarden voor visitekaartjes
no: Visittkortholdere
pl: Stojaki na wizytówki
pt: Suportes para cartões de visitas
ru: Подставки для визиток
sv: Visitkortsställ
tr: Kartvizitlikler

en: CD/DVD Cases & Organizers
xx: CD/DVD Cases & Organizers
cs: Krabičky\, obaly a pořadače na CD/DVD
da: Cd/dvd – opbevaring
de: CD-/DVD-Ordnungssysteme
es: Organizadores y cajas de CD/DVD
fr: Boîtiers et organiseurs pour CD et DVD
it: Porta CD/DVD
ja: CD・DVDケース
nl: Cd-/dvd-organizers
no: Oppbevaringsløsninger for CD og DVD
pl: Organizery na płyty
pt: Organizadores para CDs/DVDs
ru: Органайзеры для CD и DVD
sv: Cd- och dvd-förvaring
tr: CD'lik ve DVD'likler

en: Calendars\, Organizers & Planners
xx: Calendars\, Organizers & Planners
cs: Kalendáře\, diáře a plánovače
da: Kalendere og planlæggere
de: Kalender\, Organizer & Zeitplaner
es: Calendarios\, organizadores y agendas
fr: Calendriers\, organiseurs et agendas
it: Calendari\, portaoggetti e agende
ja: カレンダー・手帳
nl: Agenda's\, organizers en planners
no: Kalendere og planleggere
pl: Kalendarze\, organizery i terminarze
pt: Calendários\, organizadores e agendas
ru: Календари\, органайзеры и планировщики
sv: Kalendrar\, och planeringskalendrar
tr: Takvimler\, Organizerler ve Planlayıcılar

en: Card Files
xx: Card Files
cs: Kartotéční karty
da: Kartoteksarkiv
de: Karteikästen
es: Archivadores para tarjetas
fr: Boîtes à fiches
it: Schedari
ja: カード用ファイル
nl: Kaartbestanden
no: Kartoteker
pl: Fiszki
pt: Arquivos de cartão
ru: Картотеки
sv: Kortregister
tr: Kart Dosyaları

en: Card Sleeves
xx: Card Sleeves
cs: Obaly na kartičky
da: Kartotekskortlommer
de: Kartenhüllen
es: Fundas para tarjetas
fr: Pochettes pour cartes
it: Custodie per schede
ja: カードスリーブ
nl: Kaartenhoezen
no: Kortlommer
pl: Koszulki na karty
pt: Capas de plástico para cartões
ru: Футляры для карточек
sv: Kortfickor
tr: Kart Zarfları

en: Cash Boxes
xx: Cash Boxes
cs: Pokladní skříňky
da: Kartotekskortkasser
de: Geldkassetten
es: Cajas de caudales
fr: Caisses à monnaie
it: Cassette portavalori
ja: 手提げ金庫
nl: Geldkistjes
no: Pengeskrin
pl: Kasety na pieniądze
pt: Caixas para dinheiro
ru: Денежные ящики
sv: Kassaskrin
tr: Para Kutuları

en: Desk Organizers
xx: Desk Organizers
cs: Pořadače
da: Brevbakker
de: Schreibtischorganizer
es: Organizadores de escritorio
fr: Organiseurs de bureau
it: Portaoggetti da scrivania
ja: デスクオーガナイザー
nl: Bureau-organizers
no: Skrivebordsordnere
pl: Organizery na biurko
pt: Organizadores de escrivaninhas
ru: Органайзеры для столов
sv: Organisation för skrivbordet
tr: Masaüstü Düzenleyicileri

en: File Boxes
xx: File Boxes
cs: Pořádací krabice
da: Arkivkasser
de: Aktenaufbewahrungsboxen
es: Cajas de archivo
fr: Boîtes de classement
it: Scatole archivio
ja: ファイルボックス
nl: Archiefdozen
no: Kartotekbokser
pl: Pudła na dokumenty
pt: Caixas para arquivar
ru: Коробки для хранения бумаг
sv: Arkivlådor
tr: Dosya Kutuları

en: File Folders
xx: File Folders
cs: Pořádací složky
da: Arkivmapper
de: Register- & Hängemappen
es: Carpetas para archivos
fr: Chemises de classement
it: Cartellette
ja: ファイルフォルダー
nl: Archiefmappen
no: Kartotekmapper
pl: Skoroszyty i teczki zawieszane
pt: Pastas para arquivos
ru: Папки-регистраторы
sv: Arkivmappar
tr: Dosya Klasörleri

en: Folders & Report Covers
xx: Folders & Report Covers
cs: Obaly na pořadače a dokumenty
da: Mapper og rapportomslag
de: Aktenhüllen und Klemmhefter
es: Cubiertas para informes y carpetas
fr: Chemises et pochettes
it: Cartellette e copertine per documenti
ja: フォルダー・レポートカバー
nl: Map- en rapportomslagen
no: Mapper og rapportomslag
pl: Teczki i ofertówki
pt: Capas para pastas e relatórios
ru: Обложки для папок и отчетов
sv: Mappar och rapportomslag
tr: Klasörler ve Sunum Dosyaları

en: Pocket Folders
xx: Pocket Folders
cs: Desky s kapsou
da: Lommeomslag
de: Aktenhüllen
es: Carpetas con bolsillos
fr: Chemises à poche
it: Cartelline
ja: ポケットフォルダー
nl: Presentatiemappen
no: Lommefoldere
pl: Okładki z kieszonką
pt: Pastas com bolso
ru: Папки с карманами
sv: Fickmappar
tr: Cepli Dosyalar